Oklahoma, session 2026, SB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 70 crossing over South 9th Avenue of
Durant in Bryan County shall be designated as the “ABLE Agent Lori
Thomas Memorial Bridge”. The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the bridge.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.469 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge crossing over Interstate 240 on Interstate 40 in
Oklahoma County shall be designated as the “Donald Ray Ward Memorial
Bridge”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.470 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The intersection of U.S. Highway 77 and State Highway 11 in Kay
County shall be designated as the “Ike Glass Memorial Intersection”.
The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent
markers bearing that name to be placed at the intersection.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.471 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 69 crossing over West Main Street of
Durant in Bryan County shall be designated as the “Novak and Jean
Bullard Memorial Bridge”. The Department of Transportation shall
cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the bridge.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.472 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge over the Kiamichi River on U.S. Highway 259
approximately one-half (1/2) mile south of the U.S. Highway 259 and
State Highway 63 intersection in Le Flore County shall be designated
as the “PFC Lewis Othel Branscum Memorial Bridge”. The Department
of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing
that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.473 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 61 Page 2

The section of State Highway 102 beginning at the intersection
of East 990 Road extending north to the intersection of East
Memorial Road in Lincoln County shall be designated as the “SFC
Tomas L. Avey Bronze Star and Purple Heart Recipient Memorial
Highway”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.474 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 7 beginning at the intersection of
State Highway 110, east of Davis, extending east to the intersection
of Chickasaw Trail in Murray County shall be designated as the “SSGT
Kenneth Michael Pannell Memorial Highway”. The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 61 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 13th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 61 Page 4